Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2427
Participant; duties; fee authorized.

(1) A participant shall comply with all applicable provisions of state and federal law relating to the storage, distribution, and dispensing of donated cancer drugs and shall inspect all such drugs prior to dispensing to determine if they are adulterated or misbranded as defined in section 71-2461 or 71-2470. Such drugs shall only be dispensed pursuant to a prescription issued by a prescribing practitioner. Such drugs may be distributed to another participant for dispensing.

(2) A participant may charge a handling fee for distributing or dispensing cancer drugs under the program. Such fee shall be established in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department. Cancer drugs donated under the program shall not be resold.

Laws 2003, LB 756, § 6;

Laws 2005, LB 331, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 75.